Vermont, session 2025-2026, H26.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION
In applying and construing this act, consideration shall be given to the
following:
(1) Prior to 1978, Vermont statute provided for adult guardianship only
through its probate court with minimal procedural protections. See Linda O.
Smiddy, “Guardianship for the Adult: A Need for Due Process Protections in
Vermont,” 4 Vt. L. Rev. 95 (Spring 1979).
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 2 of 14
(2)(A) The Vermont General Assembly passed Act 192 in 1978, which
provided the district court with jurisdiction to appoint the Commissioner of
Mental Health as guardian for adults who were not institutionalized yet were
determined by the court to be “mentally retarded” and in need of protection
and supervision. That act provided for significant improvements in
guardianship procedural protections not available in the probate court system
at the time, including:
(i) a formal definition of the disabling condition upon which
guardianship jurisdiction could be founded and the requirement that there be a
comprehensive evaluation by a qualified mental retardation professional;
(ii) the right to representation by an attorney, at public expense if
needed; and
(iii) the necessity of a hearing, along with the opportunity to
present evidence and the right to subpoena and to cross-examine witnesses.
(B) Act 192 guardianship jurisdiction was subsequently assigned to
the Family Division of the Superior Court, with the Commissioner of
Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living as appointed guardian. The
probate court is now the Probate Division of the Superior Court, and the
archaic and offensive term “mentally retarded” is no longer in use.
(3) In 1979, the General Assembly added subchapter 12 to the probate
court guardianship provisions in 14 V.S.A. chapter 111. Subchapter 12
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 3 of 14
increased the procedural protections in the probate court so significantly that
they outstripped the protections available in what is now the Family Division.
In 2010 the differences between the two systems increased even further when
the General Assembly provided for voluntary guardianship in the Probate
Division without regard to an individual’s disability type. Voluntary
guardianship has never been an option in the Family Division.
(4) With regard to the Common Benefits Clause of the Vermont
Constitution, the General Assembly observed a generation ago that Vermont’s
history as an independent republic and as a State is one of equal treatment and
respect for all Vermonters. Presently, however, there are approximately 600
adults with disabilities for whom the State has been made guardian in the
Family Division despite deficiencies in how they are treated under the law
compared to how they would be treated in the Probate Division. These
differences include:
(A) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3066, the court “may
appoint a guardian ad litem if it finds the respondent or person under
guardianship is unable to communicate with or advise counsel.” In the Family
Division, there is no provision for the appointment of a guardian ad litem.
(B) Appeals from the Probate Division to the Civil Division are de
novo, and under 12 V.S.A. § 2553 and Rule 72 of the Vermont Rules of Civil
Procedure, there is an available retrial in the Civil Division of disputed factual
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 4 of 14
determinations such as mental incapacity. In the Family Division, only a
standard appeal with deference to the factual findings below is available.
(C) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3076(a) and (b), the
guardian must file an annual report with the court “on the progress and
condition of the person under guardianship … [and] the manner in which the
guardian carried out [their duties].” In the Family Division, no annual report is
required.
(D) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3073, the residential
placement of the person under guardianship may only be changed upon an
order of the court made after a motion and hearing. In the Family Division, no
court permission is required for a change in residential placement of the person
under guardianship.
(E) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3078, the court must
mail to the person under guardianship and other persons a copy of the annual
report and a statement of the person’s right to seek modification or revocation
of the guardianship. In the Family Division, there is no such requirement.
(F) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3076(c), the guardian
must file a final accounting with the court at the termination of the
guardianship. In the Family Division, no final accounting is required.
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 5 of 14
(G) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3067(a), a court order
is required for a guardianship evaluation to be conducted. No such order is
required in the Family Division.
(H) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3061(1)(B), it must be
shown that an alleged incapacity is caused by the purported disability. This is
not required in the Family Division.
(I) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3061(2) and (3), the
determination that a person is in need of a guardianship must be based upon
evidence of recent behavior. This is not required in the Family Division.
(J) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3067(c)(2)(A), the
evaluation in connection with whether a person is in need of guardianship must
specify aspects of the person’s personal care and financial affairs that the
person can manage without supervision or assistance. In the Family Division,
this is not required.
(K) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3067(c)(2)(B), the
evaluation in connection with whether a person is in need of guardianship must
specify aspects of the person’s personal care and financial affairs that the
person could manage with the supervision or assistance of support services and
benefits. In the Family Division, this is not required.
(L) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3067(c)(2)(D), the
evaluation in connection with whether a person is in need of guardianship must
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 6 of 14
contain a statement of the programs and services that the guardian should
provide. In the Family Division, this is not required.
(M) In the Probate Division, under 14 V.S.A. § 3071(c), there is a
statutory requirement that “the guardian shall always serve the interests of the
person under guardianship and shall bring any potential conflicts of interest to
the attention of the court.” In the Family Division, there are no such
requirements.
(N) The option of voluntary guardianship is available in the Probate
Division when an individual is able to understand the nature, extent, and
consequences of the proposed guardianship even if the person may otherwise
have a disability. This option provides for adult guardianship without the
stigma of the person being under a judicial finding of mental incapacity.
Voluntary guardianship is not an available option in the Family Division.
(O) Because the Probate Division is the court in which individuals
without disabilities may have guardianships granted for themselves, the current
requirement that guardianship proceedings for certain individuals with
developmental disabilities must be held in the Family Division instead of the
Probate Division may be at odds with the Common Benefits Clause of the
Vermont Constitution.
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 7 of 14
Sec. 2. SHORT TITLE
This act shall be referred to as “the Adult Guardianship Equity Act” or as
“the AGE Act.”
Sec. 3. 14 V.S.A. § 3060 is amended to read:
§ 3060. POLICY
(a) Guardianship shall be utilized only as necessary to promote the well-
being of the individual and to protect the individual from violations of his or
her the individual’s human and civil rights. It shall be designed to encourage
the development and maintenance of maximum self-reliance and independence
in the individual and only the least restrictive form of guardianship shall be
ordered to the extent required by the individual’s actual mental and adaptive
limitations. The State of Vermont recognizes the fundamental right of an adult
with capacity to determine the extent of health care the individual will receive.
(b) A person shall not be subjected to a determination of mental
incompetency regarding guardianship if the person would qualify for and agree
to the creation of an appropriate voluntary guardianship.
(c) Regardless of the form of guardianship applied for, if the proposed
person under guardianship qualifies for a voluntary guardianship under section
2671 of this title and agrees to the creation of an appropriate voluntary
guardianship, then voluntary guardianship shall be deemed the least restrictive
form of guardianship under subsection (a) of this section.
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 8 of 14
Sec. 4. 14 V.S.A. § 3061 is amended to read:
§ 3061. DEFINITIONS
The words and phrases used in this subchapter shall be defined as follows
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Person in need of guardianship” means a person who:
(A)(i) is at least 18 years of age; and
(B)(ii) is unable to manage, without the supervision of a guardian,
some or all aspects of his or her the person’s personal or financial affairs as a
result of:
(i)(I) significantly subaverage intellectual functioning which
that exists concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; or
(ii)(II) a physical or mental condition that results in
significantly impaired cognitive functioning which that grossly impairs
judgment, behavior, or the capacity to recognize reality.
(B) A person who qualifies for a voluntary guardianship under
section 2671 of this title and agrees to the creation of an appropriate voluntary
guardianship shall not be deemed a person in need of guardianship under this
subchapter.
* * *
Sec. 5. REPEAL
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 9 of 14
18 V.S.A. chapter 215 (guardianship services for people with
developmental disabilities) is repealed.
Sec. 6. 14 V.S.A. § 3062a is added to read:
§ 3062a. GUARDIANSHIP SERVICES FOR CERTAIN PERSONS WITH A
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY
(a) The terms in this section shall have the same meanings as in 18 V.S.A.
chapter 204A (Developmental Disabilities Act).
(b) After the effective date of this act, guardianships administered,
modified, and revoked in the Family Division under former 18 V.S.A. chapter
215 (guardianship services for people with developmental disabilities) shall be
administered, modified, and revoked in the Probate Division under the
procedures of this chapter. The Supreme Court is authorized to promulgate
rules to supplement the procedures in this chapter to accommodate
circumstances particular to guardianships established under former 18 V.S.A.
chapter 215, provided that the rules shall not lessen the procedural protections
or reduce the options available under this chapter.
(c)(1) Any person with knowledge of the facts may request that the State’s
Attorney in the county where the person resides file a petition with the court
alleging that:
(A) the person has a developmental disability;
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 10 of 14
(B) the person desires the assistance of a guardian or is in need of
guardianship; and
(C) there is no suitable private person to serve as guardian.
(2) The State’s Attorney shall file a petition requested under subdivision
(1) of this subsection with the court unless it clearly appears to the State’s
Attorney that the petition will be legally or factually insufficient to support an
action under this chapter.
(3) A petition filed under subdivision (2) of this subsection shall propose
that the Office of Public Guardian be appointed as the person’s guardian. If
appropriate, the court shall proceed in the same manner as for all petitions for
guardianship under this chapter.
(4) If the court after hearing determines that it is appropriate for a
guardianship to be established, and the court makes specific findings that there
is no suitable private person to serve as guardian, the court may appoint the
Office of Public Guardian as the person’s guardian. If the court makes an
appointment of the Office of Public Guardian under this subdivision, the
provisions of subchapter 13 of this chapter (public guardian) shall apply.
(d) A person who is receiving guardianship services under this chapter
from the Office of the Public Guardian or the Commissioner of Disabilities,
Aging, and Independent Living may appeal a decision of the guardian in
accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 3091 or by petition to the court, but an appeal or
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 11 of 14
petition pursuant to this subsection shall not be required for a petition to the
court by an interested person to modify or terminate a guardianship under this
chapter.
Sec. 7. 14 V.S.A. § 3067 is amended to read:
§ 3067. EVALUATION AND REPORT; BACKGROUND CHECK;
RELEASE OF EVALUATION
(a)(1) When a petition is filed pursuant to section 3063 of this title and
there is probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person in need of
guardianship under subdivision 3061(1) of this title, or when a motion for
modification or termination is filed pursuant to subdivision 3077(a)(4) of this
title, the court shall order an evaluation of the respondent. If a motion to
terminate an involuntary guardianship is made for the purpose of establishing a
voluntary guardianship, the evaluation limitations in subsection 2671(e) of this
title shall apply. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the cost of
the evaluation shall be paid for out of the respondent’s estate or as ordered by
the court. If the respondent is unable to afford some or all of the cost of the
evaluation without expending income or liquid resources necessary for living
expenses, the court shall order that the Department of Mental Health or the
Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living provide the
evaluation through qualified evaluators.
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 12 of 14
(2) A petition or motion filed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall contain a prominent notice that the respondent may object to a
proposed evaluation order and is entitled to a hearing on whether an evaluation
order should be issued.
* * *
Sec. 8. 14 V.S.A. § 3068 is amended to read:
§ 3068. HEARING
* * *
(h) Final orders of the Probate Division under this chapter shall notify the
parties of the right to appeal issues of fact to the Civil Division and issues of
law to the Supreme Court under 12 V.S.A. chapter 107 by filing a notice of
appeal with the Probate Division within 30 days after issuance of the order.
Final orders shall notify the parties of the right to seek a stay of the order from
the Probate Division or from the court appealed to under Vermont Rule of
Probate Procedure 62(d).
Sec. 9. 14 V.S.A. § 3076 is amended to read:
§ 3076. ANNUAL REPORTS; FINAL ACCOUNTING; FEES
(a) The guardian shall file an annual report with the appointing court within
30 days of following the anniversary date of the appointment.
* * *
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 13 of 14
(e) If the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or
the Office of Public Guardian has been appointed guardian, the Commissioner
or Office shall annually assess whether the person under guardianship would
qualify for a voluntary guardianship under section 2671 of this title and agree
to a voluntary guardianship being established. The assessment shall be
included in the annual report to the court required by this section.
Sec. 10. 14 V.S.A. § 3080 is amended to read:
§ 3080. APPEALS
Orders of the court issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter may
be appealed in such manner as provided in 12 V.S.A. § 2551 et seq. and Rule
72, Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, provided, however, that any order
issued pursuant to this subchapter shall not be stayed during the pendency of
an appeal except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(a) 12 V.S.A. §§ 2551 and 2553 shall govern whether an appeal under this
chapter shall be to the Civil Division or the Supreme Court. Appeals to the
Civil Division on questions of fact shall be tried de novo under Vermont Rule
of Civil Procedure 72.
(b) In an appeal to the Civil Division where the question is whether the
respondent is a person in need of guardianship, the respondent shall be entitled
to a jury trial. The right to a jury trial under this subsection may only be
waived with approval of the court.
VT LEG #379500 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.26
2025 Page 14 of 14
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379500 v.1